Utah statutes.
11-14-208.   Contest of election results  -- Procedure.
(1) (a)  Any person wishing to contest the results of a bond election shall
comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 4, Part 4,
Recounts and Election Contests.
(b)  The  local political subdivision calling the election shall be regarded
as the defendant.
(2)  Unless the complaint is filed within the period prescribed in Subsection
20A-4-403(3), a court may not:
(a)  allow an action contesting the bond election to be maintained; or
(b)  set aside or hold the bond election invalid.
